District of Columbia statutes.
19-509

Application to existing relationships.

On the effective date of this chapter [April 27, 2001]:

(1)

An act done before the effective date in any proceeding and any accrued right is not impaired by this chapter. If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that has commenced to run by the provisions of any statute before the effective date, the provisions remain in force with respect to that right; and

(2)

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in this chapter applies to instruments executed and multiple-party accounts opened before the effective date unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 202, 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 12 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (1993 Act).